Connecticut, session 2026, SB00386.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2028) (a) As used in this section:
2 (1) "Active candidate" means, with respect to a round of tabulation
3 under ranked-choice voting, a candidate (A) whose name appears on
4 the ballot or who is registered as a write-in candidate, and (B) who has
5 not been eliminated, is not a winning candidate and is not a withdrawn
6 candidate;
7 (2) "Inactive ballot" means, with respect to a given round of tabulation
8 and all subsequent rounds of tabulation under ranked-choice voting, a
9 ballot on which no vote is tabulated because (A) no candidate ranked on
10 the ballot remains an active candidate; or (B) two or more candidates are
11 ranked at the same order of preference and no other candidates that are
12 ranked higher remain as active candidates;
13 (3) "Ranked-choice voting" means a system of casting and tabulating
14 votes under which, with respect to a particular office, (A) each elector is
15 able to rank candidates on the ballot in the order of such elector's
16 preference, (B) one or more rounds of tabulation are used to determine
LCO 1 of 15

Substitute Bill No. 386
17 active candidates in accordance with electors' preferences, and (C) the
18 active candidate with the greatest number of votes after all rounds of
19 tabulation are complete is the winning candidate;
20 (4) "Rank" or "ranking" means an elector's vote expressed in
21 numerical order of such elector's preferences as to the candidates on the
22 ballot, where "1" indicates the highest preference and subsequent
23 numbers indicate lower preferences;
24 (5) "Repeated ranking" means markings on a ballot whereby the same
25 candidate is ranked at multiple, differing orders of preference;
26 (6) "Skipped ranking" means markings on a ballot whereby an elector
27 leaves a ranking unassigned but also ranks a candidate at a lower order
28 of preference;
29 (7) "Undervote" means, with respect to all rounds of tabulation under
30 ranked-choice voting for a particular office, a ballot on which no vote is
31 cast due to no candidate being ranked;
32 (8) "Winning candidate" means the candidate with the greatest
33 number of votes, under ranked-choice voting, after all rounds of
34 tabulation are complete; and
35 (9) "Withdrawn candidate" means a person (A) whose candidacy has
36 been withdrawn in accordance with the applicable provision of title 9 of
37 the general statutes, and (B) in a presidential preference primary, who
38 complies with all applicable party rules governing the timing,
39 procedures or substance of candidate withdrawals or campaign
40 suspensions.
41 (b) (1) Except as prohibited by any provision of title 9 of the general
42 statutes, the outcome of (A) any primary, other than a presidential
43 preference primary, held on or after January 1, 2028, (B) any municipal
44 election held on or after January 1, 2028, or (C) any presidential
45 preference primary held on or after January 1, 2028, may be determined
46 under ranked-choice voting.
LCO 2 of 15

Substitute Bill No. 386
47 (2) (A) For any primary or municipal election determined under
48 ranked-choice voting for an office to which electors nominate or elect no
49 more than one candidate, the provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection
50 (d) of this section shall apply.
51 (B) For any primary or municipal election determined under ranked-
52 choice voting for offices other than those described in subparagraph (A)
53 of this subdivision, the provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of
54 this section shall not apply.
55 (c) (1) (A) At each primary or municipal election conducted under
56 ranked-choice voting, the Secretary of the State shall prescribe the type
57 of ballot to be used, the instructions to appear on such ballot and the
58 layout and orientation of such ballot. The use of any ballot at any such
59 primary or municipal election shall be subject to the approval of the
60 Secretary.
61 (B) The ballot at each primary or municipal election conducted under
62 ranked-choice voting, or the portion of such ballot used for ranked-
63 choice voting, shall:
64 (i) List all candidates duly qualified to appear on such ballot for such
65 primary or municipal election and in such a manner as to allow each
66 elector who is eligible to vote in such primary or municipal election to
67 rank all such candidates in the order of such elector's preference. If such
68 ballot cannot allow for ranking of all such candidates, the Secretary may
69 limit ranking to not less than five candidates, provided such limitation
70 by the Secretary shall be uniform with respect to all electors eligible to
71 vote in such primary or municipal election;
72 (ii) For any primary, list and identify candidates in the order and
73 manner provided in subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, and (g) of section 9-
74 437 of the general statutes, at a minimum; and
75 (iii) For any municipal election, and for the purposes of sections 9-
76 249a, 9-372, 9-373b, 9-380, 9-453d and 9-453t of the general statutes,
77 indicate the party under which designation each candidate appears so
LCO 3 of 15

Substitute Bill No. 386
78 as to enable the elector to specify the party designation of the candidate
79 being ranked.
80 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 9-242 of the general
81 statutes, at each primary or municipal election conducted under ranked-
82 choice voting, the voting tabulator shall be so constructed as to comply
83 with the provisions of this section.
84 (d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, at each
85 primary or municipal election for an office to which electors nominate
86 or elect no more than one candidate, and conducted under ranked-
87 choice voting, each ballot shall be tabulated as one vote cast for the
88 highest-ranked active candidate on such ballot and tabulation shall
89 proceed in sequential rounds such that:
90 (A) In a round with three or more active candidates, the candidate
91 with the least number of votes at the completion of tabulation shall be
92 eliminated, the vote for such eliminated candidate shall be transferred
93 to a remaining active candidate in accordance with the ranked
94 preference expressed on such ballot and all remaining active candidates
95 shall advance to the next round; and
96 (B) In a round with fewer than three active candidates, the candidate
97 with the greatest number of votes at the completion of tabulation shall
98 be declared the winning candidate and no further rounds shall be
99 required.
100 (2) (A) If at the completion of tabulation a tie occurs between
101 candidates with the least number of votes and tabulation is unable to
102 proceed until such tie is resolved, the candidate to be eliminated shall
103 be determined by lot in accordance with regulations adopted under
104 subsection (f) of this section.
105 (B) If at the completion of tabulation a tie occurs between candidates
106 with the greatest number of votes, such tie shall be resolved in
107 accordance with the provisions of (i) section 9-446 of the general statutes
108 in the case of a primary other than a presidential preference primary, (ii)
LCO 4 of 15

Substitute Bill No. 386
109 section 9-332 of the general statutes in the case of a municipal election,
110 or (iii) chapter 154 of the general statutes in the case of a presidential
111 preference primary.
112 (C) (i) If a ballot is an inactive ballot with respect to any round, no
113 vote shall be tabulated on such ballot for such round.
114 (ii) If a ballot is an undervote, no vote shall be tabulated on such ballot
115 for all rounds.
116 (iii) If a ballot contains any repeated ranking or skipped ranking with
117 respect to any round, the vote shall be tabulated on such ballot for the
118 highest-ranked active candidate.
119 (e) For any primary or municipal election conducted under ranked-
120 choice voting, the provisions of section 9-445 or 9-311a of the general
121 statutes, as applicable, shall apply to the difference between the vote for
122 the winning candidate over the vote for the active candidate having the
123 next highest number of votes.
124 (f) The Secretary of the State shall adopt regulations, in accordance
125 with the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to implement
126 the provisions of this section.
127 Sec. 2. Section 9-173 of the general statutes is repealed and the
128 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2028):
129 (a) In the election for Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of the
130 State, Treasurer, Comptroller and Attorney General, the person
131 receiving the greatest number of votes for each of said offices,
132 respectively, shall be declared elected. If no person has a plurality of the
133 votes for any of said offices, the General Assembly shall choose such
134 officer.
135 (b) In the election for senator in Congress, the person receiving the
136 greatest number of votes for such office shall be declared elected; but, if
137 no person has a plurality of the votes for said office, the Governor may
138 make a temporary appointment of a senator in Congress to serve for the
LCO 5 of 15

Substitute Bill No. 386
139 ensuing two years unless the General Assembly directs a special election
140 for a senator in Congress, to be held during said period, to fill the
141 vacancy occasioned by such failure to elect.
142 (c) In all elections of representatives in Congress, state senators, state
143 representatives and judges of probate, the person having the greatest
144 number of votes shall be declared elected. [Unless otherwise provided]
145 (d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection or by
146 other law, in all municipal elections a plurality of the votes cast shall be
147 sufficient to elect.
148 (2) A municipality may, by vote of the electors of such municipality
149 at a referendum, (A) adopt ranked-choice voting, as defined in section 1
150 of this act, for the conduct of any municipal election held on or after
151 January 1, 2028, for any office to which electors elect no more than one
152 candidate, and (B) implement ranked-choice voting procedures, as
153 provided in section 1 of this act, at such election.
154 Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2028) (a) As used in this section,
155 "state office" and "district office" have the same meanings as provided
156 in section 9-372 of the general statutes.
157 (b) At any political party convention held for the endorsement of any
158 candidate for nomination to state or district office or the office of state
159 senator or state representative, if such political party has adopted
160 ranked-choice voting, as defined in section 1 of this act, pursuant to its
161 party rules, for the purpose of making such endorsement, as between
162 three or more candidates, to which the delegates at such convention
163 endorse no more than one such candidate:
164 (1) The call of a roll and the recording of the vote of each delegate
165 entitled to vote and voting shall not be required; and
166 (2) The determination of the per cent of the votes of the convention
167 delegates present and voting on any roll-call vote, as described in
168 section 9-386 of the general statutes, and of any similar reference to the
LCO 6 of 15

Substitute Bill No. 386
169 per cent of such votes, including in sections 9-400 and 9-706 of the
170 general statutes, shall be the number of votes received in any round of
171 tabulation by each active candidate, as defined in section 1 of this act, in
172 the round as a percentage of the votes received by all active candidates
173 in the round.
174 (c) In all such proceedings for the making of an endorsement for
175 nomination to a state or district office or the office of state senator or
176 state representative, the clerk or secretary of such convention shall keep
177 a true record, in writing, of the number of votes received by each active
178 candidate in each round of tabulation and of the round-by-round totals
179 and shall, at the conclusion of the voting and tabulation process,
180 announce the round-by-round and final results. Such clerk or secretary
181 shall file such record at the headquarters of the state central committee,
182 where it shall be preserved for a period of one hundred eighty days after
183 the adjournment of such convention, and such record shall be open to
184 public inspection at all reasonable times.
185 Sec. 4. Section 9-444 of the general statutes is repealed and the
186 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2028):
187 (a) (1) In the case of a primary for state or district office, each person
188 certified by the Secretary of the State as provided in section 9-440, to
189 have received the greatest number of votes of the electors eligible to vote
190 in a primary for any office shall be deemed to have been chosen as the
191 nominee of such party to such office.
192 (2) In the case of a primary for a municipal office, the moderator, or
193 the head moderator, as the case may be, shall declare nominated the
194 person having the greatest number of votes for such office and, if more
195 than one person is to be nominated for the same office, he shall declare
196 nominated the persons having the greatest number of votes for such
197 office up to the number to be chosen.
198 (3) In the case of a primary for members of a town committee, such
199 moderator shall declare elected the persons having the greatest number
200 of votes for such positions up to the number to be chosen for such
LCO 7 of 15

Substitute Bill No. 386
201 positions.
202 (4) In the case of a primary for justice of the peace, such moderator
203 shall declare elected each person on the slate having the greatest number
204 of votes for such offices. [In]
205 (b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, in all
206 primaries, a plurality of the votes cast shall be sufficient to nominate or
207 elect, as the case may be.
208 (2) A major party may, pursuant to its party rules, (A) adopt ranked-
209 choice voting, as defined in section 1 of this act, for the conduct of any
210 primary held on or after January 1, 2028, for any office to which electors
211 nominate no more than one candidate, and (B) implement ranked-
212 choice voting procedures, as provided in section 1 of this act, at such
213 primary. The chairperson or authorized representative of any such
214 party shall provide notice to the Secretary of the State, or the Secretary's
215 designee, of such party's adoption in accordance with a process and
216 timeline established by the Secretary for the provision of such notice.
217 Sec. 5. Section 9-473 of the general statutes is repealed and the
218 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2028):
219 (a) The Secretary shall establish a process and deadline for the
220 certification, by the chairman of each party to the Secretary, of the
221 number of delegates to which such party is entitled.
222 (b) Not later than the [fourteenth day before the day of the primary]
223 deadline established by the Secretary pursuant to subsection (a) of this
224 section, the chairman of each party shall certify in writing to the
225 [secretary] Secretary the number of delegates to which such party is
226 entitled pursuant to its rules. If such rules provide that such delegates
227 are to be chosen from districts, the chairman shall also certify the
228 number of delegates allocated to each district and the number to be
229 selected at large, if any. Such rules (1) may [(1)] provide for ranked-
230 choice voting, as defined in section 1 of this act, at any presidential
231 preference primary held on or after January 1, 2028, and (2) may (A)
LCO 8 of 15

Substitute Bill No. 386
232 prescribe a formula for the allocation of delegates to candidates based
233 upon the percentages of the total votes cast for, or received in any round
234 of tabulation under ranked-choice voting by, such candidates at the
235 primary, or [(2)] (B) require that all delegates shall be allocated to the
236 candidate [receiving] for whom the greatest number of votes were cast,
237 or by whom the greatest number of votes were received in any round of
238 tabulation under ranked-choice voting, notwithstanding such
239 candidate's percentage of the total votes cast for all candidates. If such
240 rules prescribe a formula for the allocation of delegates to candidates
241 based upon the percentages of the total votes cast for, or received in any
242 round of tabulation under ranked-choice voting by, such candidates at
243 the primary, the chairman shall also certify such formula and all
244 information necessary for the application of such formula to the results
245 of the primary.
246 (c) The chairman of a party shall furnish to the [secretary] Secretary,
247 upon request, a written interpretation or explanation of any ranked-
248 choice voting provided for by such party's rules, or any application of
249 [such] a delegate allocation formula prescribed, under subsection (b) of
250 this section.
251 Sec. 6. Section 9-476 of the general statutes is repealed and the
252 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2028):
253 (a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or required for the
254 purposes of implementing ranked-choice voting, as defined in section 1
255 of this act, the provisions of chapter 145 and chapter 153 concerning
256 absentee voting at primaries, conduct of primaries and return and
257 tabulation of the vote at such primaries shall apply, as nearly as
258 practicable and in the manner prescribed by the Secretary, [of the State,]
259 to a presidential preference primary.
260 (b) If a party's rules so provide pursuant to subdivision (1) of
261 subsection (b) of section 9-473, as amended by this act, each presidential
262 preference primary held on or after January 1, 2028, shall be conducted
263 under ranked-choice voting. The Secretary shall issue written
LCO 9 of 15

Substitute Bill No. 386
264 instructions for the implementation of policies and procedures
265 regarding tabulation and publication of preliminary and final results,
266 including round-by-round results. Such instructions shall provide that
267 if a candidate withdraws as of the day of the primary in accordance with
268 applicable law, any ballot cast prior to the day of the primary on which
269 such candidate was the highest-ranked candidate shall be counted as a
270 vote for the next highest-ranked candidate on such ballot. Such
271 instructions shall take into account any procedures requested in writing
272 by the chairman of the party holding such primary, which procedures
273 are reasonable, compatible with the use of ranked-choice voting ballots
274 and capable of being implemented using existing voting tabulators,
275 including any associated hardware and software. The Secretary shall
276 post all such written instructions on the Internet web site of the office of
277 the Secretary of the State.
278 (c) The primary officials of each party for each polling place shall be
279 as specified in section 9-436, except that (1) the appointment of assistant
280 registrars of voters and absentee ballot counters shall be permitted but
281 not required, (2) the minimum number of official checkers shall be one,
282 (3) the minimum number of voting tabulator tenders shall be one for
283 each two voting tabulators in use, (4) if two parties are holding
284 primaries and the registrars of voters of such parties so agree, such
285 registrars of voters may jointly appoint (A) one moderator of both
286 primaries and (B) one enrolled member of either party to serve as head
287 moderator of both primaries, (5) notwithstanding any reduction in the
288 number of primary officials as permitted by this section, any duty
289 required of primary officials by the general statutes may be performed
290 by one or more primary officials, at the direction of the registrar of
291 voters of the party of such officials, and (6) the registrar of voters shall
292 have the sole power to appoint such officials. In making such
293 appointments the registrar shall attempt, to the extent practicable, to
294 provide representation for each candidate at each polling place. The
295 provisions of section 9-436a shall apply to each candidate whose name
296 appears on the ballot, except that each such candidate, through such
297 candidate's authorized or known representative, may submit to the
LCO 10 of 15

Substitute Bill No. 386
298 registrar of voters the name of one designee as candidate checker for
299 each polling place, and the registrar of voters shall appoint such
300 designee as candidate checker for such candidate.
301 (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 9-438, the polls shall be
302 open for voting at the primary between the hours of six o'clock a.m. and
303 eight o'clock p.m.
304 (e) The moderator or head moderator of the primary in each town
305 shall prepare duplicate head moderator returns in the manner provided
306 by section 9-440, but notwithstanding the provisions of said section, the
307 moderator or head moderator may electronically transmit such returns
308 not later than eleven fifty-nine o'clock p.m. on primary day, provided a
309 hard copy is mailed to the Secretary [of the State] not later than two
310 o'clock p.m. of the day following the primary or shall hand deliver one
311 of such returns to either the Secretary or the state police by two o'clock
312 p.m. of the day following the primary. Any moderator or head
313 moderator, as the case may be, who fails to deliver such returns to either
314 the Secretary or the state police by such time shall pay a late filing fee of
315 fifty dollars.
316 Sec. 7. Section 9-484 of the general statutes is repealed and the
317 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2028):
318 (a) If a party's chairman did not certify (1) a formula pursuant to
319 section 9-473, as amended by this act, or (2) a requirement that all
320 delegates shall be allocated to the candidate receiving the greatest
321 number of votes notwithstanding such candidate's percentage of the
322 total votes cast for all candidates, the [secretary] Secretary shall
323 determine the number of delegates to be so allocated to each candidate
324 of each such party in accordance with the provisions of this section,
325 provided such allocations when the party rules do not provide for
326 ranked-choice voting shall be made under subsection (b) of this section
327 and such allocations when the party rules do provide for ranked-choice
328 voting shall be made under subsection (c) of this section. As used in this
329 section, "ranked-choice voting", "active candidate" and "withdrawn
LCO 11 of 15

Substitute Bill No. 386
330 candidate" have the same meanings as provided in section 1 of this act.
331 (b) [Such determination shall be made separately for delegates to be
332 selected at large and delegates to be selected from each district. Any] (1)
333 For allocations under this subsection when party rules do not provide
334 for ranked-choice voting, any percentage required to be determined, in
335 accordance with the provisions of this [section] subsection, shall be
336 rounded off to the nearest one-tenth of one per cent. As used in this
337 [section] subsection, "minimum percentage" means the ratio, expressed
338 as a percentage, that the number one bears to the total number of
339 delegates to be selected, but in no event shall such percentage exceed
340 twenty-five per cent.
341 [(c)] (2) (A) The [secretary] Secretary shall calculate the minimum
342 percentage, as defined in [subsection (b) of this section] subdivision (1)
343 of this subsection, using the number of delegates to be selected at large
344 and, if applicable, the number of delegates to be selected from each
345 district respectively. Except as provided in this [subsection] subdivision,
346 a candidate's percentage of the total votes cast for all candidates in the
347 state or in a district [must] is required to equal or exceed such minimum
348 percentage in order for such candidate to be allocated any at large
349 delegates or any delegates from such district, as the case may be. The
350 [secretary] Secretary shall determine each candidate's percentage of the
351 total votes cast for all candidates in the state and in each district. In the
352 event two or more candidates have received a percentage of such total
353 votes cast equal to or greater than the minimum percentage, the
354 [secretary] Secretary shall calculate an adjusted percentage, which shall
355 be each such candidate's percentage of the total votes cast for all such
356 candidates, excluding the votes cast for all other candidates. The
357 [secretary] Secretary shall then calculate the product of each such
358 candidate's adjusted percentage and the total number of delegates to be
359 selected, rounding off such product to the nearest integer. Such product
360 shall be the number of delegates allocated to each such candidate except
361 as hereinafter provided.
362 [(1)] (B) If the rounding off of such products to the nearest integers
LCO 12 of 15

Substitute Bill No. 386
363 causes the sum of all delegates so allocated to be greater than the total
364 number of delegates to be selected at large or from the district, then one
365 delegate shall be subtracted from the number allocated to the candidate
366 who received the greatest mathematical gain from such rounding off,
367 and if necessary one delegate shall also be subtracted from the number
368 allocated to the candidate who received the next greatest gain, and so
369 on until the sum of all delegates allocated to candidates equals the total
370 number of delegates to be so selected.
371 [(2)] (C) If the rounding off of such products to the nearest integers
372 causes the sum of all delegates so allocated to be fewer than the total
373 number of delegates to be selected at large or from the district, then one
374 delegate shall be added to the number allocated to the candidate who
375 suffered the greatest mathematical loss from such rounding off, and if
376 necessary one delegate shall also be added to the number allocated to
377 the candidate who suffered the next greatest such loss, and so on until
378 the sum of all delegates allocated to candidates equals the total number
379 of delegates to be so selected.
380 [(d)] (3) In the event one or no candidate has received a percentage of
381 the total number of votes cast for all candidates equal to or greater than
382 the minimum percentage, the [secretary] Secretary shall calculate an
383 adjusted percentage for each of the candidates receiving the greatest and
384 second greatest number of votes cast for all candidates. The adjusted
385 percentage shall be such candidate's percentage of the total number of
386 votes cast for both such candidates, excluding the total number of votes
387 cast for all other candidates. The [secretary] Secretary shall determine
388 the number of delegates allocated to each candidate by using the same
389 procedure as prescribed in [subsection (c) of this section] subdivision (2)
390 of this subsection.
391 (c) (1) For allocations under this subsection when party rules provide
392 for ranked-choice voting, the Secretary shall determine the number of
393 delegates, if any, to be allocated at large to each candidate and, if
394 applicable, the number of delegates, if any, to be allocated to each
395 candidate from each district respectively. An active candidate's
LCO 13 of 15

Substitute Bill No. 386
396 percentage of the votes received by all active candidates in the state or
397 in a district is required to equal or exceed fifteen per cent in order for
398 such candidate to be allocated any at large delegates or any delegates
399 from such district, as the case may be. The Secretary shall determine
400 each candidate's percentage of the votes received by all active
401 candidates under ranked-choice voting in the state and in each district.
402 Each ballot shall count as one vote for the highest-ranked candidate on
403 such ballot and shall be deemed a vote for delegates pledged to support
404 such candidate in accordance with party rules or applicable provisions
405 of this title. Any rankings for withdrawn candidates shall be treated as
406 rankings for eliminated candidates. If the vote total for any active
407 candidate is less than fifteen per cent, the active candidate with the
408 fewest votes shall be eliminated and the votes for the eliminated
409 candidate shall be counted for each ballot's next highest-ranked active
410 candidate. If the vote total of all active candidates is above fifteen per
411 cent, tabulation shall be complete. For the purpose of section 9-482,
412 votes cast for a candidate and each candidate's percentage of total votes
413 shall be determined by the Secretary on the basis of the votes received
414 in the final round of tabulation. The Secretary shall then calculate the
415 product of each such active candidate's percentage and the total number
416 of delegates to be selected, rounding off such product to the nearest
417 integer. Such product shall be the number of delegates allocated to each
418 such candidate except as hereinafter provided.
419 (2) If the rounding off of such products to the nearest integers causes
420 the sum of all delegates so allocated to be greater than the total number
421 of delegates to be selected at large or from the district, then one delegate
422 shall be subtracted from the number allocated to the candidate who
423 received the greatest mathematical gain from such rounding off, and if
424 necessary one delegate shall also be subtracted from the number
425 allocated to the candidate who received the next greatest gain, and so
426 on until the sum of all delegates allocated to candidates equals the total
427 number of delegates to be so selected.
428 (3) If the rounding off of such products to the nearest integers causes
429 the sum of all delegates so allocated to be fewer than the total number
LCO 14 of 15

Substitute Bill No. 386
430 of delegates to be selected at large or from the district, then one delegate
431 shall be added to the number allocated to the candidate who suffered
432 the greatest mathematical loss from such rounding off, and if necessary
433 one delegate shall also be added to the number allocated to the
434 candidate who suffered the next greatest such loss, and so on until the
435 sum of all delegates allocated to candidates equals the total number of
436 delegates to be so selected.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2028 New section
Sec. 2 January 1, 2028 9-173
Sec. 3 January 1, 2028 New section
Sec. 4 January 1, 2028 9-444
Sec. 5 January 1, 2028 9-473
Sec. 6 January 1, 2028 9-476
Sec. 7 January 1, 2028 9-484
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 3(c), "or the office of state senator or state representative"
was added for consistency with other provisions of the section.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 15 of 15